Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Long term care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(b) “Residential care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(c) “Senior emergency medical services” means services provided by an emergency medical ser-
vices provider, as defined in  ORS 682.025, to residents of a long term care facility or residential care
facility.
(2)[(a)] The Senior Emergency Medical Services Innovation Program is established in the  De-
partment of Human Services.  The purpose of the program is to [ select,] provide funding to and
monitor local public sector pilot projects that:
[(A)] (a)  Provide innovative strategies for  addressing the emergency medical services needs of
this state’s increasing number of aging residents who receive care and services in residential care
facilities and long term care facilities;
[(B)] (b) Encourage the efficient and appropriate use of senior emergency medical services;
[(C)] (c)  Reduce the overall costs of senior emergency medical services  while promoting quality
emergency medical services; and
[(D)] (d) Encourage unique community-based responses to challenges faced by local  communities
in meeting their residents’ needs for senior emergency medical services.
[(b) The department shall provide funding to a pilot project described in this  subsection from
moneys deposited in the Quality Care Fund established under ORS 443.001. ]
(3) The Senior Emergency Medical Services  [ Advisory ] Council is established consisting of the
following 10 members appointed by the Governor:
(a) One member representing long term care facilities;
(b) One member representing residential care facilities;
(c) One member who is a nurse or clinician in a long term care facility or a  residential care
facility;
(d) One member representing an urban  or suburban fire department or a city fire department
that provides emergency medical services;
(e) One member representing a rural fire protection district organized under ORS chapter 478;
Enrolled House Bill 2573 (HB 2573-A) Page 1
(f) One member who enters into agreements with a public sector entity to  provide emergency
medical services;
(g) One member who is a physician licensed under ORS chapter  677 or other health care prac-
titioner with expertise in emergency medical services;
(h) One member representing  the Oregon Health Authority who has expertise in emergency
medical services and trauma response;
(i) One member representing private emergency medical services providers; and
(j) One member who is a:
(A) Family member of a resident of a long term care facility or residential care facility;
(B) Caregiver in a long term care facility or residential care facility; or
(C) Member or representative of a group that advocates for seniors residing in long term care
facilities or residential care facilities.
[(4) The council shall  advise and make recommendations to the  Department of Human Services
on:]
[(a) Minimum standards and data  reporting requirements for pilot projects funded through the
program;]
[(b) The application process and timelines for the consideration  of applications for funding of pilot
projects; ]
[(c) The criteria for the selection of pilot projects to participate in the program; and ]
[(d) Other factors identified by the council as likely to facilitate successful pilot projects. ]
(4) The council shall:
(a) Advise and make recommendations to the department on:
(A) The criteria for the department to use to approve, reject or request  resubmission of
pilot project proposals that the department determines  satisfy the requirements of sub-
section (2) of this section. The criteria must include, but are not limited to:
(i) The effectiveness of the project in addressing the  policy outcomes described in sub-
section (2) of this section.
(ii) The equity impact of the project, including how the project will support  older adults
and people with disabilities.
(iii) The prioritization of a project’s measurable outcomes and reporting mechanisms.
(iv) The availability of funds in the Quality Care Fund established under ORS 443.001.
(B) Minimum standards  and data reporting requirements for pilot projects funded
through the program.
(C) Other factors identified by the council as likely to facilitate successful  pilot projects.
(b) Designate council members to participate in the deliberations on proposals  that the
department determine satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum for  the transaction of busi-
ness.
(6) Official action by the council requires the approval of a majority of the members of  the
council.
(7) The council shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to  become im-
mediately effective.
(9) The council shall meet at times and  places specified by the call of the chairperson or of a
majority of the members of the council.
(10) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(11) The department shall submit a report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on  the pilot
projects selected for the program, the success achieved  by each pilot project in meeting the goals
of the program described in subsection (2) of this  section and any recommendations for legislative
changes necessary to improve the emergency services provided throughout this state.
Enrolled House Bill 2573 (HB 2573-A) Page 2
(12) The department shall submit the report described in subsection  (11) of this section to the
authority for consideration and review prior to submitting the report as described in subsection (11)
of this section.
(13) The department shall provide staff support to the council.
(14) Members of the council are  not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and
serve as volunteers on the council.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
council in the performance of the duties of the council and, to the extent permitted by laws relating
to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of  the council consider necessary
to perform their duties.
(16) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of  this section, a member of the council may not
participate in deliberations on a proposal for a pilot project if the  member has a direct con-
flict of interest related to the pilot project.
(17)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  within 90 days of the de-
partment approving a pilot project, the department shall, subject to available  funds, allocate
moneys to the pilot project from the Quality Care Fund established under ORS 443.001.
(b) The department may extend for a reasonable duration  the 90-day timeline under
paragraph (a) of this subsection if the department determines that an extension is  reason-
ably necessary  to accommodate the negotiation of terms between the department and a pilot
project.
(18) The department  each biennium shall allocate to pilot projects approved by the de-
partment up to one third of the total funds available in the Quality Care Fund.
(19) The department shall:
(a) Conduct ongoing program evaluation, including monitoring the program for efficacy
and alignment with the policy outcomes described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Conduct site visits of pilot projects as necessary to  identify opportunities to improve
education to support the policy outcomes described in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) Report findings under this subsection to the council on a quarterly basis.
SECTION 2.
 Section 5, chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  The amendments to ORS 443.001 by section 4  [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 616, Oregon
Laws 2021, become operative on January 2, [ 2027] 2030.
SECTION 3.  Section 6, chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  [ Sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027. ]
(1) Section 1, chapter 616, Oregon Laws  2021, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed January 2, 2030.
(2) Section 2, chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed January 2, 2033.
SECTION 4.
 Section 45, chapter 32, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 45.  The Director of the Oregon Health Authority may appoint to the  Long Term Care and
Senior Care Emergency Medical Services  Advisory Committee members of the Senior Emergency
Medical Services [ Advisory ] Council established under section 1, chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2573 (HB 2573-A) Page 3
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2573 (HB 2573-A) Page 4